Maryland, session 2025, HB0765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–214.2.
(a) (1) Each hospital annually shall submit to the Commission:
(i) At times prescribed by the Commission, the hospital’s policy on
the collection of debts owed by patients; and
(ii) A report including:
1. The total number of patients by race or ethnicity, gender,
and zip code of residence against whom the hospital, or a debt collector used by the hospital,
filed an action to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill;
– 1 –

Ch. 750 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. The total number of patients by race or ethnicity, gender,
and zip code of residence with respect to whom the hospital has and has not reported or
classified a bad debt; [and]
3. The total dollar amount of the charges for hospital services
provided to patients but not collected by the hospital for patients covered by insurance,
including the out–of–pocket costs for patients covered by insurance, and patients without
insurance; AND
4. FOR HOSPITAL DEBTS OWED BY PATIENTS OF THE
HOSPITAL THAT THE HOSPITAL SOLD TO A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR, CONTRACTOR,
OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION UNDER SUBSECTION (M) OF THIS SECTION:
A. THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF THE DEBT SOLD BY
THE HOSPITAL FOR THE REPORTING YEAR;
B. THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT PAID TO THE HOSPITAL
BY THE UNIT OR, CONTRACTOR, OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION WHO PURCHASED
THE DEBT; AND
C. THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PATIENTS WHOSE DEBT WAS
SOLD, IN FULL OR IN PART, TO THE UNIT OR, CONTRACTOR, OR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION WHO PURCHASED THE DEBT.
(2) The Commission shall post the information submitted under paragraph
(1) of this subsection on its website.
(b) The policy submitted under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall:
(1) Provide for active oversight by the hospital of any contract for collection
of debts on behalf of the hospital;
(2) [Prohibit] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (M) OF THIS
SECTION, PROHIBIT the hospital from selling any debt;
(3) Prohibit the charging of interest on bills incurred by self–pay patients
before a court judgment is obtained;
(4) Describe in detail the consideration by the hospital of patient income,
assets, and other criteria;
(5) Prohibit the hospital from reporting to a consumer reporting agency or
filing a civil action to collect a debt within 180 days after the initial bill is provided;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 750
(6) Describe the hospital’s procedures for collecting a debt;
(7) Describe the circumstances in which the hospital will seek a judgment
against a patient;
(8) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section, provide for a refund of
amounts collected from a patient or the guarantor of a patient who was later found to be
eligible for free care within 240 days after the initial bill was provided;
(9) If the hospital has obtained a judgment against or reported adverse
information to a consumer reporting agency about a patient who later was found to be
eligible for free care within 240 days after the initial bill was provided for which the
judgment was awarded or the adverse information was reported, require the hospital to
seek to vacate the judgment or strike the adverse information;
(10) Provide a mechanism for a patient to:
(i) Request the hospital to reconsider the denial of free or
reduced–cost care;
(ii) File with the hospital a complaint against the hospital or a debt
collector used by the hospital regarding the handling of the patient’s bill; and
(iii) Allow the patient and the hospital to mutually agree to modify
the terms of a payment plan offered under subsection (e) of this section or entered into with
the patient; [and]
(11) Prohibit the hospital from collecting additional fees in an amount that
exceeds the approved charge for the hospital service as established by the Commission for
which the medical debt is owed on a bill for a patient who is eligible for free or
reduced–cost care under the hospital’s financial assistance policy;
(12) REQUIRE THE HOSPITAL TO DISMISS ACTIONS PENDING AGAINST
A PATIENT FOR COLLECTION OF DEBT THAT WAS SOLD UNDER SUBSECTION (M) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(13) PROHIBIT THE HOSPITAL FROM:
(I) ENGAGING IN COLLECTION ACTIVITIES ON 100% OF THE
OUTSTANDING AMOUNT OF THE COMMISSION–SET CHARGE FOR DEBT SOLD UNDER
SUBSECTION (M) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) COLLECTING ON JUDGMENTS ENTERED INTO ON PATIENT
DEBT THAT WAS SOLD UNDER SUBSECTION (M) OF THIS SECTION.
– 3 –

Ch. 750 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) (1) For at least 180 days after issuing an initial patient bill, a hospital may
not report adverse information about a patient to a consumer reporting agency or
commence civil action against a patient for nonpayment.
(2) A hospital shall report the fulfillment of a patient’s payment obligation
within 60 days after the obligation is fulfilled to any consumer reporting agency to which
the hospital had reported adverse information about the patient, INCLUDING IF THE DEBT
WAS SOLD UNDER SUBSECTION (M) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A hospital may not report adverse information to a consumer reporting
agency regarding a patient who at the time of service was uninsured or eligible for free or
reduced–cost care under § 19–214.1 of this subtitle.
(4) A hospital may not report adverse information about a patient to a
consumer reporting agency, commence a civil action against a patient for nonpayment, or
delegate collection activity to a debt collector:
(i) If the hospital was notified in accordance with federal law by the
patient or the insurance carrier that an appeal or a review of a health insurance decision
is pending within the immediately preceding 60 days; [or]
(ii) If the hospital has completed a requested reconsideration of the
denial of free or reduced–cost care that was appropriately completed by the patient within
the immediately preceding 60 days; OR
(III) IF THE HOSPITAL SOLD THE DEBT UNDER SUBSECTION (M)
OF THIS SECTION.
(5) If a hospital has reported adverse information about a patient to a
consumer reporting agency, the hospital shall instruct the consumer reporting agency to
delete the adverse information about the patient:
(i) If the hospital was informed by the patient or the insurance
carrier that an appeal or a review of a health insurance decision is pending, and until 60
days after the appeal is complete; or
(ii) Until 60 days after the hospital has completed a requested
reconsideration of the denial of free or reduced–cost care.
(M) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
HOSPITAL MAY SELL DEBT OWED TO THE HOSPITAL BY A PATIENT FOR HOSPITAL
SERVICES TO A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR AN ENTITY THAT IS UNDER CONTRACT
WITH THE UNIT OR TO A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM
TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR THE SOLE
PURPOSE OF CANCELING THE DEBT.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 750
(II) THE CONTRACT BETWEEN THE HOSPITAL AND THE
GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR, CONTRACTOR, OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION
PURCHASING THE DEBT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL STATE THAT THE SOLE
PURPOSE OF THE SALE OF THE DEBT IS TO CANCEL THE DEBT.
(III) THE PATIENT IS NOT RESPONSIBLE TO THE HOSPITAL, THE
GOVERNMENTAL UNIT, OR THE CONTRACTOR, OR THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION
FOR ANY AMOUNT OF THE DEBT THAT IS SOLD UNDER THIS SUBSECTION OR ANY
INTEREST, FEES, OR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEBT OR THE SALE.
(2) DEBT SOLD UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MUST BE FOR HOSPITAL SERVICES PROVIDED AT LEAST 2
YEARS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE SALE;
(II) MAY NOT BE EXPECTED TO YIELD ADDITIONAL
REIMBURSEMENTS FROM A THIRD–PARTY PAYOR;
(III) MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO AN OPEN APPEAL WITH AN
INSURANCE COMPANY; AND
(IV) MUST BE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE FAMILY INCOME IS AT
OR BELOW 500% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL OR WHO HAS MEDICAL DEBT
EXCEEDING 5% OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S FAMILY INCOME, AS DETERMINED BY THE
GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR, CONTRACTOR, OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION
PURCHASING THE DEBT.
(3) DEBT SOLD UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE SOLD WITH A
REDUCTION OF COMMISSION CHARGES.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL TREAT THE AMOUNT OF PAYMENTS TO
HOSPITALS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AS AN OFFSET TO UNCOMPENSATED CARE
AMOUNTS REPORTED BY HOSPITALS.
(5) THE PURCHASER OF THE DEBT SHALL:
(I) NOTIFY THE PATIENT THAT THE DEBT HAS BEEN
CANCELED; AND
(II) IF THE HOSPITAL OBTAINED A JUDGMENT AGAINST THE
PATIENT OR REPORTED ADVERSE INFORMATION TO A CONSUMER REPORTING
AGENCY ABOUT THE PATIENT, SEEK TO VACATE THE JUDGMENT OR STRIKE THE
ADVERSE INFORMATION.
– 5 –

Ch. 750 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(m)] (N) The Commission shall review each hospital’s implementation of and
compliance with the hospital’s policies and the requirements of this section.
[(n)] (O) (1) On or before February 1 each year, beginning in 2023, the
Commission shall compile the information required under subsection (a) of this section and
prepare a medical debt collection report based on the compiled information.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be:
(i) Made available to the public free of charge; and
(ii) Submitted to the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Health and Government Operations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
19–219.
(a) The Commission may review the costs, and rates, quality, and efficiency of
facility services, and make any investigation that the Commission considers necessary to
assure each purchaser of health care facility services that:
(3) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 19–214.2(M) OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE rates are set equitably among all purchasers or classes of purchasers without undue
discrimination or preference.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted July 1, 2025. It shall remain effective through December 31, 2027, and, at the end
of December 31, 2027 for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028, this Act, with
no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further
force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –